hu: Alkatrész kimeneti típusa: Analóg; Digitális; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaznog signala komponente: Analogni; Digitalni; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de saída do componente: Analógico; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Outro
pl: Typ wyjścia komponentowego: Analogowy; Cyfrowe; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Inne
zh-TW: 組件輸出類型: 類比; 數位; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de saída do componente: Analógico; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Outro
tr: Bileşen çıkış tipi: Analog; Dijital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Diğer
zh-CN: 组件输出类型: 模拟; 数字化; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de ieșire componentă: Analogic; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Altele
th: ประเภทส่วนประกอบเอาต์พุต: อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Komponento išvesties tipas: Analoginis; Skaitmeninis; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Kita
it: Tipo di uscita per componenti: Analog; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Altro
sk-SK: Typ výstupu komponentov: Analógový; Digitálny; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Iné
ja: コンポーネントの出力タイプ: アナログ; デジタル; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; その他
de: Art des Komponentenausgangs: Analog; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος εξόδου εξαρτήματος: Αναλογικό; Ψηφιακός; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Άλλο
ko: 컴포넌트 출력 유형: 아날로그; 디지털; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; 기타
nl: Component-uitvoertype: Analoog; Digitaal; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Andere
en: Component output type: Analog; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Other
fr: Type de sortie du composant: Analogique; Numérique; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Autre
da: Komponentudgangstype: Analog; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Andet
cs: Typ komponentního výstupu: Analogový; Digitální; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Jiné
fi: Komponentin ulostulotyyppi: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Muu
bg-BG: Тип изход на компонент: Аналогов; Цифров; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Други
vi: Loại đầu ra thành phần: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Khác
ru: Тип выходного сигнала компонента: Аналоговые; Цифровой; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Другое
sv: Komponentutgångstyp: Analog; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta izhoda komponente: Analogni; Digitalno; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Drugo
nb: Type komponentutgang: Analog; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Annet
es: Tipo de salida de componente: Analógico; Digital; I2C; PWM; RS232; RS485; SPI; UART; Otros